bg_BG.aff
SFX X Y 148
SFX X   а         ал        .
SFX X   а         ала       .
SFX X   а         алата     .
SFX X   а         али       .
SFX X   а         алите     .
SFX X   а         алия      .
SFX X   а         алият     .
SFX X   а         ало       .
SFX X   а         алото     .
SFX X   а         ан        .
SFX X   а         ана       .
SFX X   а         аната     .
SFX X   а         ани       .
SFX X   а         аните     .
SFX X   а         ания      .
SFX X   а         аният     .
SFX X   а         ано       .
SFX X   а         аното     .
SFX X   а         ат        .
SFX X   а         ах        .
SFX X   а         аха       .
SFX X   а         ахме      .
SFX X   а         ахте      .
SFX X   а         е         .
SFX X   а         ейки      .
SFX X   а         ели       .
SFX X   а         елите     .
SFX X   а         ем        .
SFX X   а         ете       .
SFX X   а         еш        .
SFX X   а         еше       .
SFX X   а         ещи       .
SFX X   а         ещите     .
SFX X   а         и         .
SFX X   а         ял        .
SFX X   а         яла       .
SFX X   а         ялата     .
SFX X   а         ялия      .
SFX X   а         ялият     .
SFX X   а         яло       .
SFX X   а         ялото     .
SFX X   а         ях        .
SFX X   а         яха       .
SFX X   а         яхме      .
SFX X   а         яхте      .
SFX X   а         ящ        .
SFX X   а         яща       .
SFX X   а         ящата     .
SFX X   а         ящия      .
SFX X   а         ящият     .
SFX X   а         ящо       .
SFX X   а         ящото     .
SFX X   м         дат       .
SFX X   м         де        .
SFX X   м         дели      .
SFX X   м         делите    .
SFX X   м         дем       .
SFX X   м         ден       .
SFX X   м         дена      .
SFX X   м         дената    .
SFX X   м         дени      .
SFX X   м         дените    .
SFX X   м         дения     .
SFX X   м         деният    .
SFX X   м         дено      .
SFX X   м         деното    .
SFX X   м         дете      .
SFX X   м         деш       .
SFX X   м         деше      .
SFX X   м         дох       .
SFX X   м         доха      .
SFX X   м         дохме     .
SFX X   м         дохте     .
SFX X   м         дял       .
SFX X   м         дяла      .
SFX X   м         дялата    .
SFX X   м         дялия     .
SFX X   м         дялият    .
SFX X   м         дяло      .
SFX X   м         дялото    .
SFX X   м         дях       .
SFX X   м         дяха      .
SFX X   м         дяхме     .
SFX X   м         дяхте     .
SFX X   м         й         .
SFX X   м         йте       .
SFX X   м         л         .
SFX X   м         ла        .
SFX X   м         лата      .
SFX X   м         ли        .
SFX X   м         лите      .
SFX X   м         лия       .
SFX X   м         лият      .
SFX X   м         ло        .
SFX X   м         лото      .
SFX X   я         а         .
SFX X   я         ал        .
SFX X   я         ала       .
SFX X   я         алата     .
SFX X   я         али       .
SFX X   я         алите     .
SFX X   я         алия      .
SFX X   я         алият     .
SFX X   я         ало       .
SFX X   я         алото     .
SFX X   я         ан        .
SFX X   я         ана       .
SFX X   я         аната     .
SFX X   я         ани       .
SFX X   я         аните     .
SFX X   я         ания      .
SFX X   я         аният     .
SFX X   я         ано       .
SFX X   я         аното     .
SFX X   я         ах        .
SFX X   я         аха       .
SFX X   я         ахме      .
SFX X   я         ахте      .
SFX X   я         е         .
SFX X   я         ейки      .
SFX X   я         ел        .
SFX X   я         ела       .
SFX X   я         елата     .
SFX X   я         ели       .
SFX X   я         елите     .
SFX X   я         елия      .
SFX X   я         елият     .
SFX X   я         ело       .
SFX X   я         елото     .
SFX X   я         ем        .
SFX X   я         ете       .
SFX X   я         ех        .
SFX X   я         еха       .
SFX X   я         ехме      .
SFX X   я         ехте      .
SFX X   я         еш        .
SFX X   я         еше       .
SFX X   я         ещ        .
SFX X   я         еща       .
SFX X   я         ещата     .
SFX X   я         ещи       .
SFX X   я         ещите     .
SFX X   я         ещия      .
SFX X   я         ещият     .
SFX X   я         ещо       .
SFX X   я         ещото     .
SFX X   я         и         .
SFX X   я         ят        .
