bg_BG.dic
вдам/X
везя/X
вкова/X
въздам/X
възсъздам/X
греба/X
гриза/X
дам/DX
додам/X
докова/X
допредам/X
досипя/X
дремя/X
загреба/X
загриза/X
задам/X
задремя/X
закапя/X
заклепя/X
закова/X
заора/X
зарева/X
засипя/X
застена/QX
захапя/X
защипя/X
зобя/X
зова/X
извезя/X
изгреба/X
изгриза/X
издам/X
изкапя/X
изкова/X
изкълва/X
изкъпя/X
изора/X
изпокапя/X
изпотрепя/X
изпохапя/X
изпродам/X
изрева/X
изсипя/X
изскубя/X
изтрепя/X
изтърва/X
изхапя/X
изщипя/X
капя/X
клепя/X
кова/X
кълва/X
къпя/X
нагреба/X
нагриза/X
наддам/X
надремя/X
назова/X
накапя/X
наклепя/X
накова/X
накълва/X
нарева/X
насипя/X
наскубя/X
наснова/X
натепя/X
нахапя/X
обкова/X
обоснова/X
обсипя/X
огреба/X
огриза/X
одремя/X
озова/X
окапя/X
окова/X
окъпя/X
ора/X
орева/X
оскубя/X
основа/KX
отдам/X
отзова/X
откова/X
отсипя/X
отхапя/X
отщипя/X
отърва/X
ощипя/X
плисна/X
погреба/X
подам/X
поддам/X
подремя/X
подсипя/X
позадремя/X
позова/X
поизкъпя/X
поизора/X
покапя/X
понагреба/X
понакапя/X
понасипя/X
поокапя/X
поора/X
пораздам/X
посипя/X
пощипя/X
прегриза/X
предам/X
предремя/X
преиздам/X
преора/X
преподам/X
препродам/X
пресипя/X
преснова/X
пресъздам/X
претрепя/X
прехапя/X
прещипя/X
придремя/X
призова/X
прикапя/X
прикова/X
присипя/X
прищипя/X
прогриза/X
продам/X
прокапя/X
проскубя/X
простена/QX
раздам/X
разкапя/X
разкова/X
разора/X
разпродам/X
разрева/X
разсипя/X
разтърва/X
рева/X
сдам/X
сипя/X
скапя/X
скова/X
скубя/X
снова/X
стена/KQX
създам/X
съсипя/X
трепя/X
удам/X
удремя/X
утрепя/X
ухапя/X
хапя/X
щипя/X
